Hawaii statutes.
[§353H-2] Definitions. When used in
this chapter:

"Community-based long-term support
programs" include programs administered and operated by community
agencies, faith-based organizations, and other entities offering support to
offenders for at least one year.

"Community-based programs" are
programs that are administered and operated outside of a correctional facility.

"Department" means the department of
public safety.

"Institution-based programs" are
services offered within a correctional facility.

"Reentry programs" include programs
that are located within a correctional facility.

"Reintegration programs" include
programs that are located within a correctional facility.

"Transition programs" include
programs that are located within a correctional facility. [L Sp 2007, c 8, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next